Illinois, session 104th, HB394.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Citizen Privacy Protection Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 137/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Citizen Privacy Protection Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-622, eff. 1-1-17.)